src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-n1-norm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - tieto: # 7 x contlex sg par -- kontrollerad av Elina
    tieto+N+Sg+Nom: tieto
    tieto+N+Sg+Gen: tion
    tieto+N+Sg+Par: tietoa
    tieto+N+Sg+Tra: tioksi
    tieto+N+Sg+Abe: tiotta
    tieto+N+Sg+Ine: tiossa
    tieto+N+Sg+Ela: tiosta
    tieto+N+Sg+Ill: tiethoon
    tieto+N+Sg+Ade: tiola
    tieto+N+Sg+Abl: tiolta
    tieto+N+Sg+All: tiole
    tieto+N+Sg+Ess: tietona
    tieto+N+Pl+Nom: tiot
    tieto+N+Pl+Gen: [tioitten, tietojen]
    tieto+N+Pl+Par: tietoja
    tieto+N+Pl+Tra: tioiksi
    tieto+N+Pl+Abe: tioitta
    tieto+N+Pl+Ine: tioissa
    tieto+N+Pl+Ela: tioista
    tieto+N+Pl+Ill: tiethoin
    tieto+N+Pl+Ade: tioila
    tieto+N+Pl+Abl: tioilta
    tieto+N+Pl+All: tioile
    tieto+N+Pl+Ess: tietoina
